ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 액세서리 > 헤어 액세서리: 두래그 및 헤어 랩; 헤어 밴드; 헤어 비즈 및 커프; 헤어 번/볼륨 셰이퍼; 머리빗; 붙임 머리; 머리꽂이/비녀; 머리망; 헤어핀/집게/클립; 머리 화환; 머리띠; 포니테일 홀더; 티아라; 가발 액세서리; 가발
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kledingaccessoires > Haaraccessoires: Durags en haarwraps; Haarbanjes; Haarkralen en -manchetten; Haardonuts; Haarkammen; Haarextensies; Schuifspelden en haarstokjes; Haarnetjes; Haarspelden, -klemmen en -clips; Haarkransen; Hoofdbanden; Haarelastieken; Tiara's; Pruikaccessoires; Pruiken
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за дрехи > Аксесоари за коса: Кърпи дураг и шалове за глава; Диадеми; Мъниста за коса; Аксесоари за оформяне на кок и придаване на обем; Гребени за коса; Удължения за коса; Шноли и клечки за коса; Мрежи за коса; Фиби, шноли и щипки; Венци за коса; Ленти за глава; Ластици за коса; Тиари; Аксесоари за перуки; Перуки
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužių aksesuarai > Aksesuarai plaukams: „Durag“ kepuraitės ir plaukų raiščiai; Plaukų juostos; Plaukų karoliukai ir žiedeliai; Kuodų ir tūrio formavimo priemonės; Plaukų šukos; Priauginamos plaukų sruogos; Plaukų šakutės ir smeigtukai; Plaukų tinkleliai; Plaukų segtukai ir spaustukai; Vainikai plaukams; Galvos juostos; Plaukų gumelės; Tiaros; Perukų priedai; Perukai
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Phu kiện quần áo > Phụ kiện làm tóc: Khăn trùm đầu durag và khăn quấn tóc; Dây buộc tóc; Hạt và vòng kẹp tóc; Búi tóc và lược tạo kiểu; Lược cài tóc; Tóc nối; Trâm cài đầu; Lưới bao tóc; Ghim cài, cặp tóc; Vòng hoa đội đầu; Băng đô; Chun buộc tóc; Vương miện; Phụ kiện tóc giả; Tóc giả
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky oblečenia > Vlasové doplnky: Šatky durag a vlasové zábaly; Čelenky do vlasov; Korálky a manžety do vlasov; Pomôcky na tvarovanie a objem vlasov; Hrebene na vlasy; Predlžovanie vlasov; Sponky do vlasov; Sieťky na vlasy; Vlásenky, štipce a sponky do vlasov; Vence do vlasov; Čelenky; Gumičky do vlasov; Korunky do vlasov; Doplnky k parochniam; Parochne
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházati kiegészítők > Hajkiegészítők: Duragok és hajkendők; Hajpántok; Hajgyöngyök és hajgyűrűk; Hajkonty és -volumenformálók; Hajfésűk; Hajhosszabbítások; Hajvillák és -botok; Hajhálók; Hajtűk, -karmok és -csatok; Hajkoszorúk; Fejpántok; Lófaroktartók; Tiarák; Parókakiegészítők; Parókák
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädaccessoarer > Håraccessoarer: Durags och hårsjalar; Hårband; Hårpärlor och hårmanschetter; Hårknut och volymformare; Hårkammar; Löshår; Hårgafflar och pinnar; Hårnät; Hårnålar, klämmor och hårspännen; Hårkransar; Pannband; Hårsnoddar; Tiaror; Peruktillbehör; Peruker
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์เสื้อผ้า > อุปกรณ์สำหรับผม: ดูแร็กและผ้าโพกผม; ยางรัดผม; ลูกปัดและห่วงติดผม; มวยผมและที่จัดทรงมวยผม; หวีสับ; ผมต่อ; อุปกรณ์เสียบผมและปิ่นปักผม; ตาข่ายคลุมผม; ปิ่น ที่หนีบผม และกิ๊บ; มงกุฎดอกไม้; ที่คาดศีรษะ; ยางรัดผม; มงกุฎ; อุปกรณ์วิก; วิก
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ ρούχων > Αξεσουάρ μαλλιών: Ντουράγκ και μαντήλια μαλλιών; Κορδέλες μαλλιών; Χάντρες και δαχτυλίδια μαλλιών; Αξεσουάρ διαμόρφωσης για κότσους & όγκο μαλλιών; Χτένες μαλλιών; Extensions μαλλιών; Πιρούνες μαλλιών & ραβδάκια (κοκαλάκια) για τα μαλλιά; Διχτάκια μαλλιών; Καρφίτσες μαλλιών, νύχια & κλιπ; Στεφάνια για τα μαλλιά; Κεφαλόδεσμοι (Headbands); Λαστιχάκια μαλλιών; Τιάρες; Αξεσουάρ περούκας; Περούκες
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para roupas > Acessórios para cabelo: Durags e lenços de cabelo; Faixas de cabelo; Miçangas e anéis para cabelo; Espumas para fazer coque; Pentes para cabelo; Apliques; Presilhas para cabelos; Redes de cabelo; Grampos, pinças e clipes; Guirlandas de cabelo; Faixas de cabeça; Amarradores de cabelo; Tiaras; Acessórios para peruca; Perucas
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oděvní doplňky > Vlasové doplňky: Duragy a šátky na vlasy; Gumičky do vlasů; Korálky a ozdoby do vlasů; Vlasové drdoly a tvarovače; Hřebeny; Příčesky; Spony a jehlice do vlasů; Síťky na vlasy; Sponky, vlásenky a svorky do vlasů; Věnečky do vlasů; Čelenky; Sponky na copy; Korunky; Příslušenství k parukám; Paruky
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios de vestuário > Acessórios de cabelo: Durags e envoltórios de cabelo; Fitas de cabelo; Contas e anéis para o cabelo; Coques para cabelo e modeladores de volume; Pentes para o cabelo; Extensões de cabelo; Garfos e paus para cabelo; Redes para cabelo; Travessões, molas e ganchos para cabelo; Grinaldas para cabelo; Bandoletes; Acessórios para rabo-de-cavalo; Tiaras; Acessórios de cabeleiras; Cabeleiras
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing Accessories > Hair Accessories: Durags & Hair Wraps; Hair Bands; Hair Beads & Cuffs; Hair Bun & Volume Shapers; Hair Combs; Hair Extensions; Hair Forks & Sticks; Hair Nets; Hair Pins, Claws & Clips; Hair Wreaths; Headbands; Ponytail Holders; Tiaras; Wig Accessories; Wigs
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til tøj > Hårtilbehør: Durags og headwraps; Hårbånd; Hårperler og -ringe; Tilbehør til hårknolde og fylde; Hårkamme; Hårextensions; Hårspænder og hårpinde; Hårnet; Hårnåle, hårklemmer og hårspænder; Hårspiral; Pandebånd; Hårelastikker; Tiaraer; Tilbehør til parykker; Parykker
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Kıyafet Aksesuarları > Saç Aksesuarları: Duraglar ve saç sargıları; Saç Tokaları; Saç boncukları ve yüzükleri; Saç Topuzu ve Hacim Şekillendiricileri; Tarak Tokalar; Postişler; Çatal ve Çubuk Tokalar; Saç Fileleri; Tel Tokalar, Kıskaçlı Tokalar ve Çıtçıtlı Tokalar; Çiçekli Taçlar; Saç Bantları; At Kuyruğu Tokaları; Baş Süsleri; Peruk Aksesuarları; Peruklar
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires d’habillement > Accessoires pour cheveux: Durags et foulards pour cheveux; Bandeaux pour cheveux; Perles et bagues pour cheveux; Couronnes à chignons; Peignes à cheveux; Extensions de cheveux; Barrettes à cheveux; Filets pour cheveux; Barrettes, pinces et épingles à cheveux; Couronnes pour cheveux; Bandeaux; Attaches pour queue de cheval; Diadèmes; Accessoires pour perruques; Perruques
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > ファッション小物 > ヘアアクセサリー: ドゥーラグ＆ヘアラップ; ヘアバンド; ヘアビーズ＆カフ; お団子ヘア用リング・クッション; コーム; ヘアエクステンション; ヘアピン・かんざし; ヘアネット; ヘアピン・ヘアクリップ; ヘアリース; ヘッドバンド; ヘアゴム・シュシュ; ティアラ; かつら・ウィッグ関連用品; かつら・ウィッグ
es: Ropa y accesorios > Complementos > Accesorios para el pelo: Durags y pañuelos para el cabello; Bandas para el cabello; Cuentas y anillos para el cabello; Rellenos para moños y para dar volumen al pelo; Peines; Extensiones de cabello; Horquillas para moños; Redecillas para el pelo; Horquillas, pinzas y clips para el pelo; Guirnaldas para el pelo; Diademas y cintas; Gomas del pelo; Tiaras; Accesorios para pelucas; Pelucas
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары > Аксессуары для волос: Дюраги и повязки для волос; Резинки для волос; Бусины и кольца для волос; Валики для пучков; Расчески для волос; Шиньоны; Шпильки и палочки для волос; Сетки для волос; Шпильки и заколки для волос; Венки для волос; Повязки и ободки; Резинки для хвостиков; Диадемы; Аксессуары для париков; Парики
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klestilbehør > Hårtilbehør: Durags og håromslag; Hårbånd; Hårperler og hårringer; Hårknute- og volumfiksere; Hårkammer; Hårextensions; Hårgafler og -pinner; Hårnett; Hårpinner og -spenner; Hårbøyler; Hodebånd; Hestehaleholdere; Tiaraer; Parykktilbehør; Parykker
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidungsaccessoires > Haaraccessoires: Durags & Hair-Wraps; Haarbänder; Haarperlen & -manschetten; Duttkissen; Haarkämme; Haarverlängerungen; Haargabeln; Haarnetze; Haarklammern, -nadeln & -clips; Haarkränze; Stirnbänder; Haargummis; Diademe; Perücken-Accessoires; Perücken
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatetuksen asusteet > Hiusasusteet: Duragit ja hiuskääreet; Hiuslenkit; Hiushelmet ja -korut; Hiusvalkit; Hiuskammat; Hiustenpidennykset; Hiuskammat ja -puikot; Hiusverkot; Hiuspinnit ja -soljet; Hiuskorut; Pannat; Poninhäntälenkit; Tiarat; Peruukkien lisätarvikkeet; Peruukit
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori di abbigliamento > Accessori per capelli: Durag e fasce per capelli; Fasce per capelli; Perline e anelli per capelli; Ciambelle e modellatori di volume per capelli; Pettinini per capelli; Extension per capelli; Forcelle per capelli; Retine per capelli; Forcine, pinze e fermagli per capelli; Corone per capelli; Fasce per capelli/cerchietti; Nastri elastici; Diademi; Accessori per parrucca; Parrucche
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著配件 > 髮飾配件: 綁髮巾與包頭巾; 髮圈; 髮珠與髮環; 髮髻/盤髮器; 梳子; 接髮髮片; 髮叉/髮簪; 髮網; 髮夾與鯊魚夾; 頭飾花圈; 髮箍/髮帶; 束髮圈; 皇冠髮飾; 假髮配件; 假髮
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装配饰 > 发饰: 海盗帽与包头巾; 发带; 发珠与发扣; 盘发器; 插梳/发插; 接发; 发簪; 发网; 发夹/抓夹; 花环头饰; 头饰带; 发绳; 女式王冠头饰; 假发配件; 假发
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii vestimentare > Accesorii pentru păr: Durag și bonete de protecție a părului; Elastice pentru păr; Mărgele și inele decorative pentru păr; Coc și accesorii pentru volum; Piepteni de păr; Extensii de păr; Piepteni decorativi și bețișoare; Plase de păr; Ace de păr, clești și agrafe; Coronițe pentru păr; Bentițe pentru păr; Suporturi pentru coadă de cal; Tiare; Accesorii pentru peruci; Peruci
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za oblačila > Dodatki za lase: Duragi in lasni ovoji; Trakovi za lase; Perlice in manšete za lase; Orodja za oblikovanje fig in volumna; Glavniki za lase; Lasni podaljški; Vilice in paličice za lase; Mreže za lase; Lasnice, ščipalke in sponke za lase; Venci za lase; Trakovi za glavo; Gumice za lase; Tiare; Dodatki za lasulje; Lasulje
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za odjeću > Dodaci za kosu: Durag i omoti za kosu; Trake za kosu; Perle i manžete za kosu; Punđa za kosu i oblikovanje volumena; Češljevi za kosu; Ekstenzije za kosu; Vilice i štapići za kosu; Mrežice za kosu; Duguljaste ukosnice, kopče i ukosnice; Vijenci za kosu; Trake za glavu; Držači za konjski rep; Tijare; Dodaci za perike; Perike
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do ubrań > Akcesoria do włosów: Duragi i chusty na głowę; Opaski do włosów; Koraliki i zaciski do włosów; Grzebyki i gumki do włosów; Grzebienie ozdobne; Włosy do przedłużania; Szpilki do włosów i kokówki; Siatki do włosów; Szpilki, klamry i spinki do włosów; Wianki do włosów; Opaski do włosów; Gumki do włosów; Tiary; Akcesoria do peruk; Peruki